Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0277

"Raffle."

"Raffle," as used in this chapter, means a game in which tickets bearing an individual number are sold for not more than one hundred dollars each and in which a prize or prizes are awarded on the basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or persons conducting the game, when the game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization, no person other than a bona fide member of the organization takes any part in the management or operation of the game, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other than the organization conducting the game.

[ 2009 c 133 s 1; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1; 1987 c 4 s 20. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(19).]